Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1895.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 110AGRICULTURE INNOVATION GRANT PROGRAMSec.11001. Scope of chapter.11002. Purpose.11003. Definitions.11004. Agriculture Innovation Grant Program.11005. Board.11006. Grant funds and eligibility.11007. Funding.11008. Limitation of grants.12345678910111213141516171819 11009. Applications and disposition of grants.11010. Regulations.§ 11001. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the Agriculture Innovation Grant Program.§ 11002. Purpose.It is the intent of the General Assembly to offer reimbursement grants to promote and support agricultural innovation to ensure the competitiveness, resiliency, environmental stewardship and vitality of farms, agribusinesses and agricultural support services in this Commonwealth.§ 11003. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agricultural commodity." As defined in section 2 of the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), referred to as the Right-to-Farm Law."Board." The Agriculture Innovation Board established under section 11005 (relating to board)."Conservation district." As defined in section 503 (relating to definitions)."Cooperative association." As defined in section 4502 (relating to definitions)."Eligible applicant." An applicant that meets one of the following criteria:(1) A person who grows an agricultural commodity and who has anticipated sales greater than $2,000 a year.(2) A person who processes an agricultural commodity and has anticipated sales greater than $10,000 a year.20250HB1895PN2366 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A person who provides technical assistance or services to farmers for conservation, engineering, veterinary care, animal disease management, farm management, agricultural commodity production, nutrient management or similar services.(4) A person or cooperative association that utilizes agricultural commodities to create products or energy."Innovation." The practical implementation of ideas that results in new products, processes or services."Lending institution." As defined under section 603 (relating to definitions)."Licensed doctor of veterinary medicine." A person who is currently licensed under the act of December 27, 1974 (P.L.995, No.326), known as the Veterinary Medicine Practice Act."Person." An individual, partnership, association, firm, corporation or any other legal entity."Program." The Agriculture Innovation Grant Program established under section 11004 (relating to Agriculture Innovation Grant Program).§ 11004. Agriculture Innovation Grant Program.The Agriculture Innovation Grant Program is established within the department. The program shall be administered by the department, in consultation with the board, to provide reimbursement grants to eligible applicants for costs associated with one or more of the following:(1) Utilization of innovation to improve energy efficiency, improve water quality, reduce water consumption, reduce odors or address solid waste concerns.(2) Utilization of innovation to improve production, processing, commercialization or utilization of agricultural 20250HB1895PN2366 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commodities.(3) Innovation that produces energy from agricultural sources, including manure, food waste or biomass.(4) Innovation equipment that provides low-carbon or no-carbon energy sources from agricultural commodities.(5) Innovation technology that assists eligible applicants with the management of their farms, including diagnostic tools and services.(6) Innovation technology that assists a packer, processor or cooperative in more efficient sorting, grading or processing of agricultural commodities.(7) Innovation that improves biosecurity or health of plants or animals.(8) Innovation that supports cybersecurity or data analytics.§ 11005. Board.(a) Establishment.--The Agriculture Innovation Board is established and shall consist of the following members:(1) The secretary or a designee who shall serve as chairperson.(2) The Secretary of Community and Economic Development or a designee.(3) An employee of a conservation district selected by the executive director of the State Conservation Commission.(4) The following members appointed by the Governor:(i) A representative of an institution of higher education located in this Commonwealth.(ii) A board member of a rural electric cooperative located in this Commonwealth.(iii) A member of a cooperative association located 20250HB1895PN2366 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in this Commonwealth.(iv) An employee of a lending institution located in this Commonwealth.(v) A person or an employee of a person engaged in the production or processing of an agricultural commodity in this Commonwealth.(vi) A licensed doctor of veterinary medicine who is not an employee of the Commonwealth.(5) One member of the Senate appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate or a designee who shall be an employee of the Senate.(6) One member of the Senate appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate or a designee who shall be an employee of the Senate.(7) One member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives or a designee who shall be an employee of the House of Representatives.(8) One member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives or a designee who shall be an employee of the House of Representatives.(b) Quorum.--Seven members of the board shall constitute a quorum. The consent of no less than seven members of the board, with five of the consenting members as specified under subsection (a)(1), (5), (6), (7) and (8), shall be necessary to award grants to eligible applicants under subsection (d).(c) Terms.--A board member appointed under subsection (a)(3), (4), (5), (6), (7) and (8) shall serve a term of two years and may be reappointed to successive terms. A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as appointments are made under 20250HB1895PN2366 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a).(d) Duties.--The board shall meet as necessary to evaluate and award grants under section 11006 (relating to grant funds and eligibility) to eligible applicants based on the following criteria:(1) The ability of the applicant to complete the project.(2) The ability of the applicant to incorporate one or more of the innovations under section 11004 (relating to Agriculture Innovation Grant Program).(3) How the project fulfills one or more of the innovations under section 11004.(4) The ability of the applicant to sustain the project.(5) Any other criteria as determined by the department, in consultation with the board.§ 11006. Grant funds and eligibility.(a) Innovation planning project grant.--An eligible applicant may apply for a grant to develop a strategic plan to utilize innovation to improve agricultural practices, technologies, operations or approaches within a specific business, geographic area or network. The following shall apply to a grant under this subsection:(1) The amount of a grant shall be no less than $7,500 and no more than $50,000.(2) A grantee must use non-State sourced matching funds equal to at least 30% of the grant amount for the project.(b) On-site project grant.--An eligible applicant may apply for a grant for a project that focuses on implementing innovation practices, technologies or approaches on an individual farm or property producing or processing an 20250HB1895PN2366 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agricultural commodity. The following shall apply to a grant under this subsection:(1) The amount of the grant shall be no less than $5,000 and no more than $200,000.(2) A grantee must use non-State sourced matching funds equal to at least 50% of the grant amount for the project.(c) Regional impact project grant.--An eligible applicant may apply for a grant for a project designed to address challenges, promote efficiencies or achieve specific goals for multiple eligible applicants. The following shall apply to a grant under this subsection:(1) The amount of the grant shall be no less than $100,000 and no more than $2,000,000.(2) The grantee must use non-State sourced matching funds equal to at least 50% of the grant amount for the project.(3) The project must impact two or more persons or businesses or be a cooperative association that grows, harvests, processes, packs or manages an agricultural commodity.§ 11007. Funding.The department shall accept money from the following sources:(1) Money appropriated to the department for the purposes of this chapter.(2) Gifts or donations of money, securities or other personal property except real estate, which, or the income of which, shall be used to carry out the purposes of this chapter.§ 11008. Limitation of grants.(a) Limitation.--A grant under section 11006 (relating to 20250HB1895PN2366 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grant funds and eligibility) may only be awarded to the extent money is appropriated by the General Assembly or provided by other sources.(b) Approval of grant.--The board may approve a grant that is less than the requested amount.(c) Conditions.--The department and the board may impose restrictions or special conditions upon issuance of a grant.(d) Reimbursement grants.--(1) A grant awarded under section 11006 shall be a reimbursement grant. The amount of reimbursement shall be based on actual costs submitted by an approved eligible applicant for a project awarded a grant during any fiscal year in which grants are offered.(2) Grant money shall not be used to reimburse any portion of an in-kind contribution to an eligible project.(3) Grant money may not be used to pay or reimburse wages or salaries of a grant recipient or grant recipient staff.(4) Grant money may not be used to reimburse any portion of project costs that are paid or reimbursed under another Federal or State grant program.(e) Cap on grants.--A single eligible applicant may not be awarded more than $2,000,000 in a fiscal year.§ 11009. Applications and disposition of grants.(a) Submission.--Applications for grants shall be submitted in a manner and on a form as prescribed by the department.(b) Written agreement.--The department may require a written agreement describing the terms and conditions of the grant.(c) Verification.--The department may require verification of grant expenditures.20250HB1895PN2366 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Criteria.--The department may establish criteria under which the department may demand the return of all or a portion of the grant money.§ 11010. Regulations.The department shall administer the provisions of this chapter and, with the approval of the board, shall prescribe and adopt program policy guidelines or regulations to administer and enforce this chapter.Section 2. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of 3 Pa.C.S. Ch. 110.(2) Article XVI-Z of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is repealed.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1895PN2366 - 9 - 123456789101112131415